Utah statutes.
77-3-8.   Findings and orders -- Discharge -- Undertaking -- Commitment.
(1) If it appears there is no reasonable ground to fear the commission of the
offense alleged to have been threatened, the person complained of shall be
discharged. The complainant may be ordered to pay the costs of the proceedings
if the magistrate believes the complaint was unfounded and frivolous.
(2)  If there is reasonable ground to fear the commission of an offense, the
court may, in addition or as an alternative to other relief, enter an order
permanently restraining the person from engaging in illegal conduct or acting
in any manner that could result in illegal conduct or the person complained of
may be required to enter into an undertaking in a sum not to exceed $3,000,
with one or more sufficient sureties, to keep the peace toward the people of
this state and particularly toward the persons endangered. The conditions of
the undertaking shall be in writing and shall be for a period of six months.
It may be extended on good cause shown for a longer period or enlarged and a
new undertaking may be required.
(a)  If the undertaking is given, the party complained of shall be discharged.
(b)  If the undertaking is not given, the magistrate shall commit the
defendant to jail specifying in the warrant of commitment the requirement to
give security, the amount thereof, and the effective period of time.
(c)  A person committed for not giving the required undertaking may be
discharged by any magistrate when he provides the undertaking.
